Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1221
License; requirements.

To be eligible for a license under the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act, an individual shall have attained the age of eighteen years and met the requirements established in accordance with section 38-1217.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 505;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 16;

Laws 2016, LB722, § 11;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 24.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.